Hawaii statutes.
§132-4 [OLD] REPEALED. L 1978, c 241,
§2(4).

§132-4 Investigation of fires; criminal
prosecutions. The fire chief of the county in which any fire occurs shall
immediately investigate the cause, origin, and circumstances of fire by which
property has been destroyed or damaged and so far as possible determine whether
the fire was the result of carelessness or design.

If after any investigation the county fire
chief is of the opinion that the evidence in relation to the fire indicates
that a crime has been committed, the fire chief shall present the evidence to
the prosecuting officer of the county in which the supposed offense was
committed, with the request that the prosecuting officer institute such
criminal proceedings as the evidence may warrant. [L 1917, c 115, pt of §49; RL
1925, pt of §3463; RL 1935, pt of §6839; am L 1939, c 239, §1(6, 7, 8); RL
1945, §8529; RL 1955, §184-5; HRS §132-5; am and ren L 1978, c 241, §2(5); gen
ch 1985]

Case Notes

Transmittal of
circular on fire regulation to violator does not constitute notice of
violation. 5 H. 41.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next